Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1741.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "best management practice" or "BMP" in section 1601-R of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1601-R. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Best management practice" or "BMP." A practice or combination of practices determined by the commission or United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service to be effective and practical, considering technological, economic and institutional factors, to manage nutrients and sediment to protect surface water and groundwater. The term includes the use of cover crops.* * *"Cover crop." A crop grown primarily for the purpose of controlling erosion, suppressing weeds, reducing soil compaction, increasing moisture and nutrient content of soil, improving yield potential, attracting pollinators or providing habitat for beneficial insects and wildlife as well as supplemental food for animals, including certain grasses, small grains and legumes."Cover crop project." A best management practice in which cover crops are used.20250HB1741PN2143 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 * * *Section 2. Section 1604-R(e) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1604-R. Powers, duties and administration.* * *(e) Powers and duties of participating conservation districts.--The following shall apply:* * *(2.1) (i) Except as provided under subparagraph (ii), no less than 15% of the amount apportioned to each conservation district shall be awarded for cover crop projects.(ii) If a conservation district receives complete applications for cover crop projects in amounts less than the amount under subparagraph (i), the conservation district may allocate the remaining amount to other best management practices.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1741PN2143 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819